Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 42.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a governmental entity may not grant legal personhood to, or recognize legal personhood in, any:(a) Artificial intelligence;(b) Inanimate object;(c) Body of water;(d) Land;(e) Real property;(f) Atmospheric gas;(g) Astronomical object;(h) Weather;(i) Plant;(j) Nonhuman animal; or(k) Any other member of a taxonomic domain that is not a natural person.(2) As used in this section:(a) "Body of water" means any natural or man-made accumulation of water, regardless of whether the accumulation of water is static or subject to a force that causes a hydrological current.(b) "Governmental entity" means a court, the legislature, and any agency as defined in RCW 42.56.010.(c) "Land" means the solid terrestrial surface or subsurface of the earth.(d) "Legal personhood" means the legal rights and obligations of a natural person, or a legal person other than a natural person, under the laws of this state.(e) "Real property" means any building, fixture, improvement, appurtenance, structure, or other development that is affixed permanently to land.--- END ---